Tennessee, session 114, HB1442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Stop American Gestapo Act
(SAGA)."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "law enforcement officer" means an officer of a local,
state, or federal law enforcement agency, or a person acting on behalf of a local, state,
or federal law enforcement agency.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), it is an offense for a law enforcement
officer to wear a mask, face covering, or personal disguise while interacting with the
public in the performance of the law enforcement officer's official duties.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b):
(1) A law enforcement officer may, while interacting with the public in the
performance of the officer's official duties, wear a mask or face covering that:
(A) Meets the U.S. National Institute for Occupational Safety and
Health N95 classification for the purpose of preventing the transmission of
airborne diseases; or
(B) Is designed to protect against exposure to smoke or other
airborne particles during a state of emergency related to a natural
disaster; and
HB1442
008772
- 1 -

(2) Special weapons and tactics (SWAT) team officers may utilize gear
necessary to protect the officers' faces from physical harm while in the
performance of SWAT responsibilities.
(d) It is an offense for a law enforcement officer to interact with the public in the
performance of the officer's official duties without clearly displaying the officer's name or
badge number on the officer's uniform or other clothing in a manner that is visible to the
public.
(e) A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 008772